pt-PT: Altura da cintura: Alto; Baixo; Meio; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul de talie: Înaltă; Joasă; Medie; Altele
cs: Výška pasu: Vysoký; Nízký; Střední; Jiné
zh-TW: 腰圍高度: 高; 低; 中; 其他
it: Altezza della vita: Alto; Basso; Media; Altro
ja: ウエストの上がり: 高; 低; 中; その他
hu: Derékmagasság: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Egyéb
de: Taillenhöhe: Hoch; Niedrig; Mittel; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Liemens aukštis: Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinio aukščio; Kita
nl: Tailleomtrek: Hoog; Laag; Midden; Andere
bg-BG: Повдигане на талията: Висок; Нисък; Среден; Други
en: Waist rise: High; Low; Mid; Other
fi: Vyötärön nosto: Korkea; Matala; Keskikorkea; Muu
es: Altura de cintura: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Otros
ko: 허리 밑위: 높음; 낮음; 중간; 기타
ru: Посадка на талии: Высокие; Низкие; Средние; Другие
pt-BR: Altura da cintura: Alta; Baixa; Média; Outro
pl: Wysokość talii: Wysoki; Niski; Średni; Inne
sk-SK: Výška pása: Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Iné
da: Taljestigning: Høj; Lav; Midt; Andet
tr: Bel Yükseltme: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
zh-CN: 腰升: 高; 低; 中型; 其他
sl-SI: Položaj pasu: Visok; Nizek; Na sredini; Drugo
th: เอวเพิ่มขึ้น: เอวสูง; ต่ำ; เอวกลาง; อื่นๆ
el: Ύψος μέσης: Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Mid; Άλλο
nb: Midjeløft: Høy; Lav; Mid; Annet
vi: Độ cao cạp: Cao; Trễ; Giữa; Khác
hr-HR: Struk: Visoki; Niski; Srednji; Ostalo
sv: Midja: Hög; Låg; Medel; Övrigt
fr: Taille: Haute; Basse; Moyenne; Autre